Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 3 State Budget
35-3-24.
Control of state spending.

All department and agency heads and their employees are responsible for ensuring that financial obligations and expenditures for which they have responsibility do not exceed amounts appropriated and are spent in accordance with state laws.

Persons with the authority to obligate the state contractually for goods and services shall be designated in writing by department and agency heads.

In the event of an obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure in excess of amounts appropriated, the department or agency head with oversight responsibility shall make a written determination of the amount and the cause of the overobligation or overexpenditure, the person(s) responsible, and corrective actions taken to prevent reoccurrence. The plan of corrective actions contained within the report shall detail an appropriate plan to include, but not limited to, such issues as the implementation of waiting lists, pro-rata reduction in payments and changes in eligibility criteria as methods to address the shortfall. The report will be filed within thirty (30) days of the discovery of the overobligation or overexpenditure with the budget officer, the controller, the auditor general, and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees.

In the event a quarterly report demonstrates an obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure in excess of amounts appropriated, the department or agency head with oversight responsibility shall file monthly budget reports with the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees for the remainder of the fiscal year. The monthly budget reports shall detail steps taken towards corrective actions and other measures to bring spending in line with appropriations. In addition, the budget officer and controller shall ensure that the department’s or agency’s obligations, encumbrances, and expenditures for the remainder of the fiscal year result in the department or agency ending the fiscal year within amounts appropriated.

The controller shall not authorize payments for additional staff, contracts, or purchases for any department or agency not projected to end a fiscal year within amounts appropriated unless necessitated by immediate health and safety reasons, which shall be documented upon discovery and reported, along with anticipated or actual expenditures, to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees within fifteen (15) days.

A state employee who has knowingly and willingly encumbered, obligated, or authorized the expenditure of state funds in excess of amounts appropriated for those purposes or entered into contracts without proper authorization may be placed on disciplinary suspension without pay for up to thirty (30) days in accordance with §

36-4-36

.

A state employee who knowingly, willfully, and repeatedly authorizes actions resulting in encumbrances or spending of state funds in excess of amounts appropriated may be fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or terminated from employment.

Upon receipt of any budgetary information indicating an obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure in excess of the amounts appropriated, the chairperson of the house or senate finance committee may request a written report to be submitted by the director of administration within ten (10) calendar days. The report shall indicate if the obligation, encumbrance, or expenditure in excess of the amounts appropriated resulted in any disciplinary action or other penalty in accordance with subsection (f) or (g) of this section. If not, the report shall explain why no disciplinary action or other penalty was imposed in accordance with subsection (f) or (g).

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 5.

35-3-24.1.
Program performance measurement.

Beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, the governor shall submit, as part of each budget submitted to the general assembly pursuant to §

35-3-7

, performance objectives for each program in the budget for the ensuing fiscal year, estimated performance data for the fiscal year in which the budget is submitted, and actual performance data for the preceding two (2) completed fiscal years. Performance data shall include efforts at achieving equal opportunity hiring goals as defined in the department’s annual affirmative action plan. The governor shall, in addition, recommend appropriate standards against which to measure program performance. Performance in prior years may be used as a standard where appropriate. These performance standards shall be stated in terms of results obtained.

The governor may submit, in lieu of any part of the information required to be submitted pursuant to subsection (a), an explanation of why the information cannot, as a practical matter be submitted.

The office of management and budget shall be responsible for managing and collecting program performance measures on behalf of the governor. The office is authorized to conduct performance reviews and audits of agencies to determine progress towards achieving performance objectives for programs.

In order to collect performance measures from agencies, review performance and provide recommendations the office of budget and management is authorized to coordinate with the office of internal audit regarding the findings and recommendations that result from audits conducted by the office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 80, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 1, § 16; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 7.

35-3-25.
Enumeration of restricted receipt, general revenue, and federal receipt accounts and debts service charges.

The appropriations section in each budget bill for any fiscal year shall enumerate for each program and department all restricted receipt account appropriations, all general revenue appropriations, and all federal receipt appropriations, such that total general fund expenditures are listed for each program or agency or department except debt service charges. For this purpose, all debt service charges shall be enumerated as a program within the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 105, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 1.

35-3-26.
Technology related expenditures.

All expenditures for information resources and information technologies defined in § 29-8-2 [repealed], regardless of source of financing, shall be in conformance with a plan of expenditures approved by the legislature as part of its annual budget review process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 23.

35-3-27.
Reimbursement of debt service costs.

The Rhode Island airport corporation shall pay to the State of Rhode Island the amount of debt service which would otherwise have been paid if the state had not refunded bonds or defeased with the proceeds from the tobacco securitization executed in June 2002 the general obligation bonds issued for airport purposes.

The Narragansett bay water quality management district commission shall pay to the State of Rhode Island the amount of debt service which would otherwise have been paid if the state had not defeased with the proceeds from the tobacco securitization executed in June 2002 the user fee funded guaranteed general obligation bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 103, art. 5, § 1.